New Jersey, session 222, S103.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act, a credit card scanner means a device which electronically or otherwise reads, records, or transmits the information stored, encoded, or imbedded on or in a credit, debit, or other charge card. b.    Any person who possesses a credit card scanner without a lawful purpose is guilty of a disorderly persons offense. c.     Any person who uses a credit card scanner for an unlawful purpose is guilty of a crime of the second degree. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month following enactment.